el: Πρότυπο πιστοποίησης προστατευτικής θωράκισης μοτοσικλέτας: Πιστοποίηση CE (χωρίς καθορισμένο πρότυπο); EN 1621-1 (Προστατευτικό άκρων); EN 1621-2 (Προστατευτικό πλάτης); EN 1621-3 (Προστατευτικό στήθους); Συμβατό με EN 17092 (Πρότυπο ενδυμάτων); Χωρίς πιστοποίηση; Άλλο
zh-CN: 摩托车护甲认证标准: CE 认证（标准未指定）; EN 1621-1（肢体护具）; EN 1621-2（背部护具）; EN 1621-3（胸部护具）; 符合 EN 17092（服装标准）; 未认证; 其他
lt-LT: Motociklo apsaugų sertifikavimo standartas: CE sertifikatas (standartas nenurodytas); EN 1621-1 (galūnių apsauga); EN 1621-2 (nugaros apsauga); EN 1621-3 (krūtinės apsauga); Suderinama su EN 17092 (drabužių standartas); Nesertifikuota; Kita
sv: Certifieringsstandard för mc-skydd: CE-certifierad (standard ej angiven); EN 1621-1 (ledskydd); EN 1621-2 (ryggskydd); EN 1621-3 (bröstskydd); EN 17092-kompatibel (klädstandard); Ej certifierad; Övrigt
it: Standard di certificazione dell'armatura per moto: Certificato CE (standard non specificato); EN 1621-1 (Protettore per arti); EN 1621-2 (Paraschiena); EN 1621-3 (Protezione per il torace); Compatibile EN 17092 (Standard abbigliamento); Non certificato; Altro
nb: Sertifiseringsstandard for pansring for motorkjøretøy: CE-sertifisert (standard ikke angitt); EN 1621-1 (lembeskytter); EN 1621-2 (ryggbeskytter); EN 1621-3 (brystbeskytter); EN 17092-kompatibel (plaggstandard); Ikke sertifisert; Annet
sl-SI: Certifikacijski standard za motoristično zaščitno opremo: Certifikat CE (standard ni določen); EN 1621-1 (zaščita okončin); EN 1621-2 (zaščita hrbta); EN 1621-3 (zaščita prsnega koša); V skladu s standardom EN 17092 (standard za oblačila); Brez certifikata; Drugo
nl: Certificeringsnorm motorprotectie: CE-gecertificeerd (norm niet gespecificeerd); EN 1621-1 (Ledenmatenbeschermer); EN 1621-2 (Rugbeschermer); EN 1621-3 (Borstbeschermer); EN 17092-compatibel (Kledingnorm); Niet gecertificeerd; Overig
cs: Norma pro certifikaci motocyklových chráničů: Certifikace CE (standard nespecifikován); EN 1621-1 (chránič končetin); EN 1621-2 (chránič zad); EN 1621-3 (chránič hrudníku); Kompatibilní s EN 17092 (standard pro oděvy); Bez certifikace; Jiné
ro-RO: Standard de certificare a protecțiilor pentru motocicliști: Certificat CE (standard nespecificat); EN 1621-1 (Protecție pentru membre); EN 1621-2 (Protecție pentru spate); EN 1621-3 (Protecție pentru piept); Compatibil cu EN 17092 (Standard de îmbrăcăminte); Necertificat; Altele
pl: Norma certyfikacji kamizelki ochronnej na motocykl: Certyfikat CE (brak określonej normy); EN 1621-1 (Ochraniacz kończyn); EN 1621-2 (Ochraniacz pleców); EN 1621-3 (Ochraniacz klatki piersiowej); Zgodność z EN 17092 (Norma odzieżowa); Bez certyfikatu; Inne
ko: 오토바이 보호대 인증 표준: CE 인증(표준 미지정); EN 1621-1(팔다리 보호대); EN 1621-2(등 보호대); EN 1621-3(가슴 보호대); EN 17092 호환(의류 표준); 미인증; 기타
pt-BR: Norma de certificação da proteção para motociclistas: Certificação CE (padrão não especificado); EN 1621-1 (protetor de membros); EN 1621-2 (protetor de costas); EN 1621-3 (protetor de peito); Compatível com EN 17092 (padrão para vestuário); Não certificado; Outros
de: Zertifizierungsstandard für Motorradschutzkleidung: CE-zertifiziert (Norm nicht angegeben); EN 1621-1 (Gelenkprotektor); EN 1621-2 (Rückenprotektor); EN 1621-3 (Brustprotektor); EN 17092-kompatibel (Bekleidungsnorm); Nicht zertifiziert; Sonstige
hu: Motoros protektor tanúsítási szabványa: CE-tanúsítvánnyal (szabvány nem meghatározott); EN 1621-1 (Végtagvédő); EN 1621-2 (Hátvédő); EN 1621-3 (Mellkasvédő); EN 17092-kompatibilis (Ruházati szabvány); Nem tanúsított; Egyéb
ja: バイク装備認証標準: CE認定 (規格指定なし); EN 1621-1 (四肢プロテクター); EN 1621-2 (バックプロテクター); EN 1621-3 (チェストプロテクター); EN 17092準拠 (衣服規格); 認定なし; その他
vi: Tiêu chuẩn chứng nhận áo giáp xe máy: Chứng nhận CE (không xác định tiêu chuẩn); EN 1621-1 (Bảo vệ tứ chi); EN 1621-2 (Bảo vệ lưng); EN 1621-3 (Bảo vệ ngực); Tương thích EN 17092 (Tiêu chuẩn trang phục); Không được chứng nhận; Khác
hr-HR: Standard certificiranja motociklističke zaštitne opreme: CE certificirano (standard nije specificiran); EN 1621-1 (štitnik za udove); EN 1621-2 (štitnik za leđa); EN 1621-3 (štitnik za prsa); Kompatibilno s EN 17092 (standard za odjeću); Nije certificirano; Ostalo
sk-SK: Certifikačná norma motocyklových chráničov: Certifikát CE (nešpecifikovaný štandard); EN 1621-1 (chránič končatín); EN 1621-2 (chránič chrbta); EN 1621-3 (chránič hrudníka); Kompatibilné s EN 17092 (štandard pre odevy); Bez certifikácie; Iné
fi: Moottoripyörän panssarien sertifiointistandardi: CE-hyväksytty (standardia ei määritetty); EN 1621-1 (raajasuoja); EN 1621-2 (selkäsuoja); EN 1621-3 (rintasuoja); EN 17092 -yhteensopiva (vaatestandardi); Ei sertifioitu; Muu
en: Motorcycle armor certification standard: CE certified (standard not specified); EN 1621-1 (Limb protector); EN 1621-2 (Back protector); EN 1621-3 (Chest protector); EN 17092 compatible (Garment standard); Not certified; Other
ru: Стандарт сертификации мотоэкипировки: Сертификат CE (стандарт не указан); EN 1621-1 (защита конечностей); EN 1621-2 (защита спины); EN 1621-3 (защита груди); Соответствует EN 17092 (стандарт одежды); Не сертифицировано; Другое
fr: Norme de certification des équipements de protection pour motocyclistes: Certifié CE (norme non spécifiée); EN 1621-1 (Protecteur de membre); EN 1621-2 (Protecteur dorsal); EN 1621-3 (Protecteur de poitrine); Compatible EN 17092 (Norme pour vêtements); Non certifié; Autre
bg-BG: Стандарт за сертификация на мотоциклетна броня: CE сертифициран (неуточнен стандарт); EN 1621-1 (Протектор за крайници); EN 1621-2 (Протектор за гръб); EN 1621-3 (Протектор за гърди); Съвместим с EN 17092 (стандарт за облекло); Без сертификация; Друго
pt-PT: Norma de certificação de proteções para motociclistas: Certificação CE (norma não especificada); EN 1621-1 (proteção de membros); EN 1621-2 (proteção de costas); EN 1621-3 (proteção de peito); Compatível com EN 17092 (norma de vestuário); Sem certificação; Outro
da: Standard for certificering af motorcykelbeskyttelsestøj: CE-certificeret (standard ikke angivet); EN 1621-1 (ledbeskytter); EN 1621-2 (rygbeskytter); EN 1621-3 (brystbeskytter); EN 17092-kompatibel (beklædningsstandard); Ikke certificeret; Andet
es: Estándar de certificación de la protección para motocicleta: Certificación CE (estándar no especificado); EN 1621-1 (protector de extremidades); EN 1621-2 (protector de espalda); EN 1621-3 (protector de pecho); Compatible con EN 17092 (estándar de prendas); No certificado; Otro
zh-TW: 機車護具認證標準: CE 認證 (未指定標準); EN 1621-1 (四肢護具); EN 1621-2 (背部護具); EN 1621-3 (胸部護具); 符合 EN 17092 (服裝標準); 未經認證; 其他
tr: Motosiklet zırhı sertifikasyon standardı: CE sertifikalı (standart belirtilmemiş); EN 1621-1 (Uzuv koruyucu); EN 1621-2 (Sırt koruyucu); EN 1621-3 (Göğüs koruyucu); EN 17092 uyumlu (Giysi standardı); Sertifikasız; Diğer
th: มาตรฐานการรับรองชุดเกราะมอเตอร์ไซค์: ผ่านการรับรอง CE (ไม่ระบุมาตรฐาน); EN 1621-1 (อุปกรณ์ป้องกันแขนขา); EN 1621-2 (อุปกรณ์ป้องกันหลัง); EN 1621-3 (อุปกรณ์ป้องกันหน้าอก); รองรับ EN 17092 (มาตรฐานเครื่องแต่งกาย); ไม่ผ่านการรับรอง; อื่นๆ